trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.is.dix
    <pardef n="/gamall__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamall</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömul</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamalt</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamlir</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamlar</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömul</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamlan</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamalt</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamlar</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömul</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlum</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamalli</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlum</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlum</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlum</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamals</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamallar</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamals</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamalla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamalla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamalla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamli</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gömlu</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eldri</l>
          <r>gamall<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="gamall"><i></i><par n="/gamall__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gamall"><i></i><par n="/gamall__adj"/></e>
